index.dic
авджия/F9M0
авокадо/J0
австриецъ/F9M2
агнецъ/M7
агроминистъръ/F7M0
ажио/J0
акъръ/F7M1
алармаджия/F9M0
алпиецъ/F9M2
амплоа/J0
амфитеатъръ/F7M0
анадолецъ/F9L0
ансамбълъ/F7M0
арабинъ/F9M0
ариецъ/F9M2
архиерей/F7M0
асириецъ/F9M2
аташе/F7J0
аудиометъръ/F7M0
багренъ/L4
бандитизъмъ/M0
барбекю/J0
баскетболъ/F7I0
безбрѣжие/L0
безпристрастие/L0
бейзболъ/F7I0
белгиецъ/F9M2
берберинъ/F9M0
бесене/J0
бизнесдѣло/L0
бизнеселитъ/I0
биле/F7J0
биофилтъръ/F7M0
бичме/J0
благоустроенъ/L4
благоухание/L0
блуждаене/J0
богоубиецъ/M2
боецъ/M2
боне/F7J0
бракосъчетание/L0
браманизъмъ/M0
бранище/J3
братоубиецъ/M2
бреме/F7J1
броенъ/L4
броецъ/M2
букле/J0
българинъ/F9M0
българоубиецъ/M2
бюро/F9L0
бѣглецъ/M6
бѣлене/J0
бѣлогвардеецъ/F9M2
валия/F9M0
варенъ/L4
вдаденъ/L4
вдетиненъ/L4
вдъхновенъ/L4
великденче/J0
вермахтъ/I0
веселие/L0
византиецъ/F9M2
викарий/F7M0
виме/F7J0
вкамененъ/L4
включенъ/L4
влагалище/F7J3
влакно/F8L0
влюбенъ/L4
вмѣстилище/J3
водоснабденъ/L4
водохранилище/J3
волейболъ/F7I0
вперенъ/L4
вроденъ/L4
врѣме/F7J1
все/H7
всезнание/L0
всеотдаденъ/L4
всичкия/H7
всѣкакъвъ/H7
всѣки/H7
всѣкой/H7
вталенъ/L4
втренченъ/L4
втрещенъ/L4
възбуденъ/L4
възвишенъ/L4
въздухъ/F7I0
възлюбленъ/L4
възмутенъ/L4
възобновенъ/L4
възпаленъ/L4
възпрѣпятствие/L0
възроденъ/L4
възхитенъ/L4
вълнометъръ/F7M0
въодушевенъ/L4
въорѫженъ/L4
въплътенъ/L4
вѣрую/J0
вѣтрецъ/M3
вѫзелъ/F7M1
габровецъ/F9L0
газенъ/L4
галенъ/L4
ганаецъ/F9M2
гардже/F7J0
гасенъ/L4
гвардеецъ/F9M2
гвинеецъ/F9M2
гемиджия/F9M0
главоного/J3
гностицизъмъ/M0
голишарче/J0
гореизброенъ/L4
гореизложенъ/L4
горепосоченъ/L4
горнище/F7J3
господинъ/F7F8M1
гостолюбие/L0
готвенъ/L4
градецъ/M3
грахъ/F7I0
гробище/F7J3
грозде/F7J0
грънджъ/I0
гюле/F7J0
гюрултаджия/F9M0
гѫсе/F7J0
данаецъ/F9M2
дворецъ/F9L0
дворянинъ/F9M0
деецъ/M2
демо/J0
дере/J0
дете/F7J6
детеубиецъ/M2
детище/J3
дефетизъмъ/M0
децилитъръ/F7M1
дециметъръ/F7M1
джезве/F7J0
джогингъ/F7I0
диаметъръ/F7M0
дивачество/L0
дисконто/J0
доваренъ/L4
довѣренъ/L4
долнище/J3
допълнение/L0
дуо/J8
душманинъ/F9M0
дърво/F7F8J2
държало/J8
държание/L0
евразиецъ/F9M2
европеецъ/F9M2
его/J0
едромлѣнъ/L4
експортъ/I0
ексхибиционизъмъ/M0
електричество/L0
елитъ/I0
епикуреецъ/F9M2
жабче/F7J0
жезълъ/F7M0
женище/J3
животновѫдство/L0
жилище/J3
жълтениче/F7J0
заклинание/L0
западноевропеецъ/F9M2
западъ/I0
запрѣнъ/L4
засмѣнъ/L4
заявление/L0
звездоброецъ/F9M2
землище/J3
злодейство/L0
знаме/F7J1
зрелище/J3
играло/J8
игрище/J3
идеализъмъ/M0
идолопоклонство/L0
извалѣнъ/L4
изнурение/L0
изтокъ/I0
изтравниче/J0
иконопиство/L0
име/F7J1
импортъ/I0
индивидуализъмъ/M0
индиецъ/F9M2
индонезиецъ/F9M2
ислямъ/I0
кабърче/F7J0
каймаклия/F9M0
какъвто/H4
калайджийство/L0
капене/J0
капителъ/I0
кариеризъмъ/M0
картофище/J3
кафене/F7J0
керемидчия/F9M0
кече/J0
кешъ/I0
километъръ/F7M1
кинодеецъ/M2
кипърецъ/F9L0
китаецъ/F9M2
козелъ/F7F8M1
който/H4
колега/L0
колело/F7F9J2
колие/F7J0
колѣно/F9J4
комшия/F9M0
конопище/J3
копче/F7J0
корабокрушение/L0
кореецъ/F9M2
космосъ/F7I0
котелъ/F7F8M1
кошерище/J3
кракъ/F8I1
кратно/J3
крило/F9J4
крушение/L0
кръвопиецъ/F9M2
крѫжецъ/M0
кукурузище/J3
кутре/F7J0
кълбо/F7J2
кюре/J0
лактометъръ/F7M0
ланецъ/F9L0
латвиецъ/F9M2
ленище/J3
лизингъ/I0
лисиче/F7J0
литовецъ/F9L0
литъръ/F7M1
лице/F9J3
лондончанинъ/F9M0
лѣтовище/J3
лѣярство/L0
мазе/F7J0
малаецъ/F9M2
малоазиецъ/F9M2
малорусиецъ/M2
малтиецъ/F9M2
маркетингъ/F7I0
масонство/L0
масрафлия/F9M0
медецъ/M3
меню/J0
месецъ/M7
метъръ/F7M1
механизъмъ/M0
микрометъръ/F7M1
милилитъръ/F7M1
милиметъръ/F7M1
минало/J8
миръ/I0
мистъръ/I0
миткало/J8
млѣнъ/L4
многоточие/L0
множимо/J3
момиче/F7J0
монголоизъмъ/M0
мъртвецъ/M6
мѫжле/F7J0
мѫчилище/J3
надолнище/J3
наказание/L0
нанадолнище/J3
нарцисизъмъ/M0
настояще/J3
натискъ/I0
небе/F7J5
небце/F7J3
невѣдение/L0
недовидѣнъ/L4
недопѣтъ/L4
неизживѣнъ/L4
немлѣнъ/L4
непрѣодолѣнъ/L4
неумение/L0
нефтохранилище/J3
нечий/H5
нигериецъ/F9M2
никакъвъ/H6
никой/H6
ничий/H6
номеръ/F7I1
номинализъмъ/M0
нѣкакъвъ/H5
нѣкой/H5
оборище/J3
овалѣнъ/L4
овцевѫдецъ/F9L0
огнище/F7J3
огрѣнъ/L4
око/F8J6
олимпиецъ/F9M2
омбре/J0
оптимизъмъ/F7M0
орелъ/F7F8M1
ориентъ/I0
оризъ/F7I0
оселъ/F7M1
осмостишие/L0
отцеубиецъ/F9M2
очистително/J3
памтивѣкъ/I0
пане/J3
паралия/F9M0
пардесю/J0
партиецъ/F9M2
пасище/J3
перило/F9L0
периметъръ/F7M0
персиецъ/F9M2
петелъ/F7F8M1
пиле/F7J0
писалище/J3
платнище/J3
племе/F7J1
плодохранилище/J3
плячкаджия/F9M0
подбуждение/L0
позволително/J3
полинезиецъ/F9M2
полуврѣме/F7J1
полукълбо/F7J2
полумесецъ/M7
пони/J0
понятие/L0
пороище/J3
посмѣшище/J3
празнословие/L0
прилагателно/J3
прогресъ/I0
прозвище/J3
прозрение/L0
прокси/J0
протекционизъмъ/M0
прѣдопрѣдѣление/L0
прѣзиме/F7J1
прѣзрѣнъ/L4
прѣлюбодеецъ/M2
пълновластие/L0
пюре/F7J0
пѣснопоецъ/F9M2
равнецъ/M0
равнище/F7J3
разлѣтъ/L4
размахъ/I0
разорѫжение/L0
разхвърлѣнъ/L4
рамо/F7J7
резе/F7J0
реометъръ/F7M0
рокендролъ/F7I0
рокъ/F7I0
ромеецъ/F9M2
роумингъ/I0
ругание/L0
рѣчище/J3
салтомортале/J0
самарджия/F9M0
самодеецъ/M2
самоубиецъ/M2
самоубийство/L0
сантилитъръ/F7M1
сантиметъръ/F7M1
светилище/J3
светъ/L4
свърталище/J3
святъ/L4
свѣтло/J8
северозападъ/I0
североизтокъ/I0
северъ/I0
сексапилъ/F7I0
сексъ/F7I0
сепаратизъмъ/M0
септемвриецъ/F9M2
сирачество/L0
сирене/F8J3
сириецъ/F9M2
сказуемо/J3
скеле/F7J0
скуошъ/F7I0
славянинъ/F9M0
слънце/F9J3
слѣденъ/L4
слѣнъ/L4
слѣтъ/L4
сомалиецъ/F9M2
сопрано/J3
софиянецъ/F9L0
спектофотометъръ/F7M0
становище/J3
страшилище/J3
стреме/F7J1
стърнище/J3
стѣснение/L0
схематизъмъ/M0
сънище/J3
сърне/F7J0
състезание/L0
сѣме/F7J1
сѫдилище/J3
теграметъръ/F7M0
телче/F7J0
товарене/J0
топливо/F9L0
топчия/F9M0
тракиецъ/F9M2
трейдингъ/I0
туловище/F7J3
турчинъ/F9M1
убиецъ/M2
удостовѣрение/L0
уебъ/I0
узо/J0
усоище/J3
устабашия/F9M0
ухо/F8J6
фабиянство/L0
факелъ/F7M1
филантропизъмъ/M0
филе/F7J0
финикиецъ/F9M2
футболъ/F7I0
хаваецъ/F9M2
хамалинъ/F9M0
хасе/F7J0
хектолитъръ/F7M1
хектометъръ/F7M1
хладъ/I0
хърватинъ/F9M0
цареубиецъ/F9M2
цвѣте/F7J7
чадо/F7L0
чалгаджия/F9M0
чародеецъ/F9M2
чекмедже/F7J0
червеноармеецъ/F9M2
червеногвардеецъ/F9M2
чешмѣнъ/L4
чийто/H4
чипсъ/F7I0
чистилище/J3
човѣкоубиецъ/M2
чудо/J5
шарлатанство/L0
шашкънинъ/F9M0
шегобиецъ/F9M2
шимпанзе/F7J0
щиглецъ/M7
югозападъ/I0
югоизтокъ/I0
югъ/I0
яйце/F9J3
яке/F7J0
